Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PICKWICK MILL DAM.new text end new text begin $400,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the Pickwick Mill Inc., for improvements and repairs to the historic Pickwick Mill Dam in Winona County. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end